Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10H-402] Purchase of policy and
payment of premiums on an individual's behalf. An insurer shall allow a
person to purchase an individual or group long-term care insurance policy and
pay the premiums for an individual or group long-term care insurance policy
that covers the person, the person's spouse, or reciprocal beneficiary, as well
as their parents and grandparents, and in-law parents and grandparents.
Nothing in this section shall preclude an insurer from underwriting such a
policy. [L 1999, c 93, pt of §2]

DERIVATION TABLE OF ARTICLE 10H FROM THE NATIONAL
ASSOCIATION OF INSURANCE COMMISSIONERS 1998 MODEL ACT OR REGULATIONS

1998 NAIC ACT § 1998
NAIC REGULATION § HRS §

1 0 431:10H-101

2 0 431:10H-102

3 0 431:10H-103

4 0 431:10H-104

5 0 431:10H-105

6A 0 431:10H-106

6B 0 431:10H-107

6C 0 431:10H-108

6D 0 431:10H-109

6E 17 431:10H-110

6F 431:10H-111

6G 431:10H-112

6H 431:10H-113

6I to K 431:10H-114

7 0 431:10H-115

8 0 431:10H-116

9 0 431:10H-117

0 5 431:10H-201

0 6A 431:10H-202

0 6B 431:10H-203

0 6C 431:10H-204

0 6D 431:10H-205

0 6E 431:10H-206

0 6F 431:10H-207

0 7A 431:10H-208

0 7A 431:10H-209

0 7B 431:10H-210

0 8A 431:10H-211

0 8B 431:10H-212

0 8C 431:10H-213

0 8D 431:10H-214

0 8E 431:10H-215

0 8F 431:10H-216

0 8G 431:10H-217

0 9 431:10H-218

0 10 431:10H-219

0 11 431:10H-220

0 12 431:10H-221

0 13 431:10H-222

0 15 431:10H-223

0 16A 431:10H-224

0 16B 431:10H-225

0 17 431:10H-226

0 18 431:10H-227

0 19 431:10H-228

0 20A, 20B 431:10H-229

0 20C 431:10H-230

0 21 431:10H-231

0 22 431:10H-232

0 23 431:10H-233

0 24 431:10H-234

0 25 431:10H-235

0 26 431:10H-236

0 0 431:10H-301

0 0 431:10H-302

0 0 431:10H-303

0 0 431:10H-304

0 0 431:10H-401

0 0 431:10H-402

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next